Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1510
Stay of execution; sureties; approval; bond tantamount to judgment confessed.

The sureties for the stay of execution may be taken and approved by the clerk, the bond shall be recorded on the register of actions and have the force and effect of a judgment confessed from the date thereof against the property of the sureties, and the clerk shall enter such sureties on the judgment index, as in the case of other judgments.

Laws 1875, § 6, p. 50;

R.S.1913, § 8051;

C.S.1922, § 8992;

C.S.1929, § 20-1510;

R.S.1943, § 25-1510;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 25.

Stay bond, when recorded, is a judgment within purview of statute providing for revivor of dormant judgments. Baker Steel & Machinery Co. v. Ferguson, 137 Neb. 578, 290 N.W. 449 (1940).